Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
ARTICLE 30
CREDIT UNIONS - GENERAL PROVISIONS

Cross references:

For the "Revised Uniform Unclaimed Property Act", see article 13 of title 38.

Law reviews:

For article, "Arbitrating Lender Liability

C

laims", see 18

C

olo. Law. 879 (1989).

Section

11-30-101. Definitions - organization - charter - investigation.

A credit union is a cooperative association, incorporated pursuant to this article for the twofold purpose of promoting thrift among its members and creating a source of credit for them at fair and reasonable rates of interest.

As used in this article:

"Board" means the financial services board, created in section 11-44-101.6.

(I.1) "Commissioner" means the state commissioner of financial services.

"Division" means the division of financial services created in section 11-44-101.

A credit union may be organized in the following manner:

Any eight or more residents of the state of Colorado who meet the membership requirements of section 11-30-103 (2) may execute, in a number of copies to be specified by the commissioner, articles of incorporation setting forth therein the terms by which they agree to be bound. The articles shall state the name and address of the proposed credit union; the names and addresses of the incorporators; the number of shares subscribed by each incorporator; and the term of existence of the corporation, which may be perpetual.

The incorporators shall prepare, in a number of copies to be specified by the commissioner, proposed bylaws for the governing of the credit union, consistent with the provisions of this article, on standard forms approved by the commissioner and shall define therein the proposed eligibility requirements for membership.

The proposed bylaws shall further set forth: The classes of shares which the credit union is authorized to issue; if such shares are to consist of one class only, the par value of each of the shares or a statement that all of the shares are without par value, or, if the shares are to be divided into classes, a statement of the par value of the shares of each such class or that the shares are to be without par value. In addition, if the shares are to be divided into classes, the bylaws shall designate each class and a statement of its preferences, its limitations, and its relative rights with respect to the shares of each other class.

An application in such form as may be prescribed by the commissioner together with the articles of incorporation and the bylaws shall be filed with the commissioner, in a number of copies to be specified by the commissioner, upon the payment of a filing fee, as determined from time to time by the commissioner, to cover the reasonable and necessary expense to the division attributable to such application. Within thirty days after such filing and payment of such fee, the commissioner shall determine whether the same conform to the provisions of this article and whether such a credit union would benefit the members and proposed members thereof, consistent with the purposes of this article, the general character and fitness of the incorporators, and the economic advisability of establishing the proposed credit union. Except for a community charter application, which application shall be submitted to the board for hearing pursuant to section 11-30-101.7, the commissioner may approve or deny an application without notice and hearing.

The commissioner shall make or cause to be made an investigation to determine whether the incorporators and organizers are qualified and whether their qualifications and financial experience are consistent with their responsibilities and duties. An investigation shall also be conducted to determine if an incorporator or organizer has been convicted of any criminal activity. The commissioner may establish by rule the content of such investigations and what, if any, investigations by other agencies or authorities may be treated as substantially equivalent to and accepted in lieu of an investigation by the commissioner.

Upon approval of an application and documents by the commissioner, or by the board with respect to a community charter application, the commissioner shall issue a certificate of approval, in a number of copies equal to the number of copies of the articles of incorporation required to be filed pursuant to subsection (2)(a) of this section as specified by the commissioner, and attach a copy thereof to each copy of the said articles of incorporation. The incorporators shall then file approved articles with the secretary of state, and a copy of the articles, certified by the secretary of state, shall be filed with the commissioner. The incorporators shall pay to the secretary of state a fee for filing the articles of incorporation and a fee for certifying the copy of articles of incorporation furnished by the incorporators for filing with the commissioner, both fees to be determined and collected pursuant to section 24-21-104 (3), C.R.S.

After the said certified copy of articles of incorporation have been filed with the commissioner, he shall issue a charter for such credit union, at which time the credit union shall become a body corporate having the powers enumerated in section 7-103-102, C.R.S., except as otherwise provided or limited in this article.

The bylaws approved by the commissioner shall then be adopted by the initial board of directors of the credit union.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 295, § 1.

CSA:

C. 47, § 1.

L. 41:

p. 370, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 38-1-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 38-1-1.

L. 67:

p. 315, § 1.

L. 73:

p. 497, § 1.

L. 79:

(2)(a) amended, p. 414, § 1, effective May 22.

L. 83:

(2)(a) amended and (2)(c) added, p. 483, § 1, effective July1; (4) amended, p. 876, § 39, effective July 1.

L. 89:

(3) amended, p. 608, § 1, effective April 19.

L. 90:

(1) and (2)(b) amended, p. 1837, § 6, effective May 31.

L. 93:

(1)(b), (3), and (4) amended, p. 1442, § 1, effective June 6; (5) amended, p. 861, § 27, effective July 1, 1994.

L. 94:

(3) amended, p. 62, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(2)(a), (2)(b), (3)(a), and (4) amended, p. 184, § 1, effective April 8.

11-30-101.7. Hearing procedures for community field of membership credit unions.

An application for a community field of membership shall be subject to approval by the board after the required notice and hearing requirements in this section are met.

Upon submission by the commissioner, pursuant to section 11-30-101 (3), of a community field of membership application, the board shall hold a public hearing to consider the application. Such hearing shall be set by the board within six months after receipt of an application from a group that is subject to the requirements of this section; except that the board may postpone such hearing for valid reasons and good cause.

The board shall give notice of a hearing on a community field of membership application at least thirty days before the hearing date, by registered or certified mail, to the principal office of each credit union, savings and loan association, or bank within the neighborhood, community, or rural district sought to be served by the proposed community credit union, and to such other persons or credit unions, savings and loan associations, or banks as the board may designate.

Such notice must be in the form prescribed by the board and must include the names of the incorporators, the name and location of the proposed community credit union, the date, time, and place of the hearing, and a statement that the application and proposed or amended articles of incorporation and proposed bylaws are available for inspection in the office of the board. The board shall also cause such notice to be published at least once, not less than twenty days prior to the hearing date, in a newspaper of general circulation within the neighborhood, community, or rural district in which the proposed credit union is to be located.

Notwithstanding any other provisions in this section to the contrary, if the board has given the required notice of a hearing and as of the tenth day prior to the hearing has received no written protest against such application, the board may grant such community field of membership without a hearing if the applicants are known to the board.

On hearing, the board may admit into evidence the application and any other relevant information in the files of the division. The applicant and all others who receive notice by registered or certified mail pursuant to subsection (3) of this section shall be entitled to be heard and to introduce testimony at such hearing. The board may entertain such evidence or testimony from others as the board determines, in its sole discretion, to be necessary.

Within ninety days following the conclusion of a hearing, the board shall issue a written order granting a community field of membership if the board finds:

That the application, articles of incorporation, and bylaws conform to the provisions of this article and any rules promulgated by the board;

That the credit union would benefit its members or proposed members, consistent with the purposes of this article, that the general character and fitness of the incorporators is appropriate, and that it is advisable from an economic standpoint to establish the proposed credit union;

That the neighborhood, community, or rural district is politically, geographically, socially, or economically well-defined; and

That the members of other credit unions within the neighborhood, community, or rural district are specifically excluded from membership, except as otherwise provided by the board for good cause.

A credit union seeking to establish a community field of membership as part of a conversion from a federal to a state charter is subject to the notice and hearing requirements of this section.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire section added, p. 1443, § 2, effective June 6.

L. 2004:

(1), (2), (3), IP(5), and (6) amended, p. 129, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(3) amended, (SB 13-154), ch. 282, p. 1471, § 28, effective July 1.

11-30-102. Bylaws of credit unions.

The commissioner shall cause to be prepared a standard form of bylaws, consistent with this article, to be issued to all credit unions. All credit unions shall operate under the standard bylaws; except that each such credit union, subject to the approval of the commissioner, shall propose its own name, its field of membership, the number of members of its board of directors, its credit committee, its supervisory committee, provisions relative to times and places of meetings of the membership and of the board of directors, provisions relative to the conduct of elections and balloting of the credit union, and modifications of the standard bylaws deemed appropriate by the board of directors for the operation of the individual credit union. Any and all amendments to the bylaws shall be approved by the commissioner before they become operative.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 297, § 2.

CSA:

C. 47, § 2.

L. 41:

p. 371, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 38-1-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 38-1-2.

L. 67:

p. 316, § 2.

L. 84:

Entire section amended, p. 372, § 1, effective July 1.

11-30-103. Membership.

Credit union membership shall consist of the incorporators and any other persons and organizations which are elected to membership and which pay any entrance fee. Organizations, incorporated or otherwise, composed for the most part of the same general group as the credit union membership may be members. A central credit union may be organized under this article and may have a membership made up principally of other credit unions organized pursuant to this article or any credit unions authorized to operate within the state of Colorado, and such membership may also include the officers and committee members of such credit unions, members or persons within the field of membership of credit unions within the state which have entered into or are about to enter into voluntary or involuntary liquidation proceedings, and small groups which the commissioner determines lack the potential membership to organize their own credit union if such groups have a common bond of employment or association.

Credit union organization and membership, other than those of a central credit union, shall be limited to groups having a common bond of employment or association or groups which reside within a well-defined neighborhood, community, or rural district having a population of no more than twenty-five thousand or as otherwise authorized by the board. Small groups which the commissioner determines to lack the potential membership to organize their own credit union may be eligible for membership in an existing credit union if such small groups have a common bond of employment or association. A member of the immediate family of any person who, under the provisions of this article, is eligible for membership in a credit union may also be admitted to membership therein. "Immediate family" means persons related by blood, by marriage, or by adoption.

A member who leaves the field of membership of the credit union may retain membership in the credit union as provided by the bylaws of the credit union.

Except as to accounts, which are defined in and which shall be paid as provided for in article 15 of title 15, C.R.S., nothing in this article shall be construed to prohibit credit unions organized under this article from carrying membership accounts in the names of two or more persons in joint tenancy; and, if any credit union transacting business in this state issues shares and deposits in the names of two or more persons payable to them or to any of them, such shares and deposits, or any part thereof or any interest or dividend thereon, may be paid to any one of said persons whether the others are living or not, and the receipt or acquittance of the person so paid shall be a valid and sufficient discharge to the credit union from all of said persons and their heirs, executors, administrators, and assigns, and such shares and deposits shall be deemed to be owned by said persons in joint tenancy with the right of survivorship.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 298, § 5.

CSA:

C. 47, § 5.

L. 41:

p. 372, § 5.

L. 45:

p. 307, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 38-1-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 38-1-5.

L. 67:

p. 317, § 4.

L. 73:

p. 1646, § 4.

L. 75:

(3) R&RE, p. 393, § 1, effective July 1; (4) amended, p. 586, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 77:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 565, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 83:

(1) amended, p. 483, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 84:

(2) amended, p. 372, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 90:

(2) amended, p. 1837, § 7, effective May 31; (4) amended, p. 920, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 93:

(2) amended, p. 1444, § 3, effective June 6.

L. 2002:

(4) amended, p. 1359, § 6, effective July 1.

11-30-103.5. Branches. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 93:

Entire section added, p. 1445, § 4, effective June 6.

L. 2013:

Entire section repealed, (SB 13-159), ch. 193, p. 790, § 3, effective May 11.

11-30-104. Powers.

A credit union has the following powers to:

Receive the savings of its members either as payment on shares or as deposits, including the right to conduct Christmas clubs, vacation clubs, and other such thrift organizations or plans within the membership;

Make loans to its members;

Make loans to other credit unions as provided in this article;

Deposit in state and national financial institutions insured by an agency of the federal government and to invest in the shares and deposits of the central credit union organized pursuant to this article;

Invest in any of the following: Obligations of the United States or securities guaranteed or insured by any agency of the United States; obligations of any state or territory of the United States, or of any political subdivision or instrumentality thereof, except revenue obligations issued to provide, enlarge, or improve electric power, gas, water, or sewer facilities, or any combination thereof, issued by any city or town, or other similar municipal corporation having a population of less than five thousand persons, as determined by the latest federal decennial census; and, to an extent which shall not exceed ten percent of its shares, deposits, and undivided earnings, in shares of mutual funds or investment companies, stocks, bonds, or other securities of any corporation or religious or educational organizations, as may be approved as prudent and sound by the commissioner;

Borrow money as provided in section 11-30-115;

Apply for and hold membership in a central credit union organized pursuant to this article, in any other central credit union authorized to transact business in this state, and in any organization or association of credit unions;

Acquire, through purchase or other lawful transactions, and to hold title to real and personal property necessary and incidental to the operation of the credit union, and to sell, mortgage, or otherwise dispose of the same;

Exercise such incidental powers as shall be necessary to enable it to carry on effectively the business for which it is incorporated;

Upon the written approval of the commissioner, engage in any activity in which such credit union could engage were it operating under a federal charter at the time, provided such activity is not prohibited by the laws of this state;

Sell all or any portion of its assets and purchase all or any portion of the assets of another credit union and assume the liabilities of the selling credit union and its field of membership, subject to the approval of the commissioner;

Allow shares and deposits to be paid for, transferred, and withdrawn for payment to the account holder or to third parties in such manner and with such procedures as may be established by the board of directors. This paragraph (l) shall apply only with respect to share draft accounts in which the entire beneficial interest is held by one or more individuals or members or by an organization which is operated primarily for religious, philanthropic, charitable, educational, or other similar purposes and which is not operated for profit.

Make loans to, or permit the assumption of loans by, officers or employees of the division who are members of the credit union;

Participate with other credit unions, credit union organizations, or financial organizations in making loans to credit union members when the borrower is a member of either the credit union originating the loan or the credit union purchasing a participation interest in the loan;

Act as trustee or custodian of individual retirement accounts for the credit union's members authorized by federal or state law or as trustee or custodian of any plan established pursuant to the federal "Self-Employed Individuals Tax Retirement Act of 1962", as amended, or the federal "Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974", as amended, if a significant portion of the participants in any such plan are eligible for membership in the credit union and the funds held in the trustee or custodial capacity are invested in the credit union's shares or deposits;

Act as fiscal agent for and receive payments on shares and deposits from nonmember units of the federal government or the state of Colorado or any agency or political subdivision thereof;

Receive payment on deposits from nonmember financial institutions which are supervised under the laws of this state, the United States, or another state or territory of the United States.

As authorized pursuant to section 10-2-601 (2), C.R.S., a credit union may, pursuant to federal law or under such rules as may be adopted by the financial services board or the commissioner of insurance pursuant to section 10-2-601, C.R.S., act as the agent, through the credit union or any credit union service organization, for any insurance company authorized to do business in this state by soliciting and selling insurance and collecting premiums on policies issued by such company. For such services, a credit union or credit union service organization may receive such fees or commissions as may be agreed between such entity and the insurance company.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 297, § 4.

CSA:

C. 47, § 4.

L. 41:

p. 372, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 38-1-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 38-1-4.

L. 67:

p. 316, § 3.

L. 75:

(1)(d) amended, p. 394, § 1, effective June 16; (1)(j) added, p. 374, § 3, effective June 26.

L. 79:

(1)(k) added, p. 415, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(1)(l) and (1)(m) added, p. 612, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 83:

(1)(k) amended and (1)(n) and (1)(o) added, p. 484, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 84:

(1)(d) and (1)(e) amended and (1)(p) and (1)(q) added, p. 373, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 90:

(1)(e), (1)(j), (1)(k), and (1)(m) amended, p. 1837, § 8, effective May 31.

L. 96:

(1)(q) amended, p. 185, § 2, effective April 8.

L. 97:

(2) added, p. 432, § 8, effective April 24.

L. 2003:

(1)(m) amended, p. 1207, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(1)(m) and (1)(n) amended, p. 130, § 2, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the "Self-Employed Individuals Tax Retirement Act of 1962", see Pub.L. 87-792, 76 Stat. 809; for the "Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974", see Pub.L. 93-406, codified at 29 U.S.C. § 1001 et seq.

11-30-105. Exclusive right to use "credit union" in title - penalty.

A credit union organized in accordance with the provisions of this article 30, or in accordance with the laws of the United States or the laws of another state or territory of the United States, has the exclusive right to use the words "credit union" in its name or title; but an association composed of credit unions transacting business in this state may use the words "credit union" in its name or title. Any other person, association, corporation, or partnership using the words "credit union" in its name or title commits a petty offense.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 297, § 3.

CSA:

C. 47, § 3.

L. 41:

p. 371, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 38-1-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 38-1-3.

L. 92:

Entire section amended, p. 934, § 1, effective April 2.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3149, § 120, effective March 1, 2022.

Cross references:

For the penalty for a petty offense, see § 18-1.3-503.

11-30-106. Examinations - reports - powers of commissioner - rules - penalty.

Credit unions shall be under the supervision of the commissioner. Every credit union shall be examined by the commissioner at least once during any eighteen-month period. The commissioner shall assess each credit union an amount to cover the expenses of the division attributable to the supervision of state-chartered credit unions subject to the commissioner's jurisdiction. The amount assessed shall be determined according to a schedule or schedules or any other method established by the commissioner to be appropriate, but the assessment shall be at the same rate for all credit unions; except that the commissioner may establish a separate rate schedule for corporate and central credit unions. The commissioner may waive the payment of all or a portion of the assessment with respect to the year in which a charter is issued or canceled or in which a final distribution is made in liquidation.

The commissioner shall establish the division's annual assessment to be collected at least semiannually in such amounts as are sufficient to generate the moneys appropriated by the general assembly to the division for each fiscal year.

Repealed.

Annually, every credit union shall file a financial report with the commissioner on a date established by the commissioner, in a form prescribed by the commissioner. Said commissioner may require that additional reports be filed. For failure to file a report when due, unless excused for cause, a credit union shall pay to said commissioner a penalty, as prescribed by regulation, for each day of delinquency in filing.

The board may issue rules and regulations necessary for the administration and enforcement of this article and shall reference the same to the sections of this article to which they apply. Such rules and regulations shall be promulgated pursuant to the provisions of article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., and a copy of such rules and regulations and of each order shall be mailed to each credit union in this state at least thirty days prior to the effective date thereof, except as to temporary or emergency rules.

Except in cases where there is a statutory right to appeal to the board, any person aggrieved and directly affected by a final order of the commissioner may obtain judicial review thereof by filing an action for review with the Colorado court of appeals pursuant to section 24-4-106 (11), C.R.S., within thirty days after the date of issuance of such order.

The commissioner has the power to charge off the whole or any part of any asset of any credit union which could not be lawfully acquired by it and to reduce the value of any asset of a credit union to its market value or to a reasonable value, if no market value can be established. If the losses of a credit union exceed its undivided earnings and reserve funds so that the reasonable value of its assets is less than the total amount due the shareholders, the commissioner may order a reduction in the liability to each shareholder, dividing the loss proportionately among all shareholders. Any reduction from each share account shall be a specified percentage sufficient to correct the impaired condition and preserve the solvency of the credit union. If thereafter the credit union shall realize from such assets a greater amount than that fixed by the order of reduction, such excess shall be divided proportionately among the shareholders to whom liability was previously reduced but only to the extent of such reduction.

The commissioner has the power to issue subpoenas and require attendance of any and all officers, directors, agents, and employees of any credit union and such other witnesses as he may deem necessary in relation to its affairs, transactions, and conditions, and may require such witnesses to appear and answer such questions as may be put to them by the commissioner, and may require such witnesses to produce such books, papers, or documents in their possession as may be required by the commissioner. Upon application of the commissioner, any person served with a subpoena issued by him may be required, by order of the district court of the county where the credit union has its principal office, to appear and answer such questions as may be put to him by the commissioner and be required to produce such books, papers, or documents in his possession as may be required by the commissioner.

The commissioner may issue cease-and-desist orders if the commissioner determines from competent and substantial evidence that a credit union is engaged or has engaged, or when the commissioner has reasonable cause to believe the credit union is about to engage, in an unsafe or unsound practice or is violating or has violated, or when the commissioner has reasonable cause to believe the credit union is about to violate, a material provision of any law or regulation or any condition imposed in writing by the commissioner or any written agreement made with the commissioner. Any person aggrieved by a final order of the commissioner issued pursuant to this section may appeal such order to the financial services board pursuant to section 11-44-101.8.

The commissioner may suspend or remove any director, officer, or employee of a credit union when the commissioner determines such person has:
(8) (a) (I) The commissioner may suspend or remove any director, officer, or employee of a credit union when the commissioner determines such person has:

Violated the provisions of this article or a lawful regulation or order issued thereunder;

Engaged or participated in any unsafe or unsound practice in the conduct of credit union business;

Committed or engaged in any act, omission, or practice which constitutes a breach of fiduciary duty to the credit union, and the credit union has suffered or will probably suffer financial loss or other damage, or the interests of members or account holders may be seriously prejudiced thereby; or

Received financial gain by reason of a violation, practice, or breach of fiduciary duty that involved personal dishonesty or demonstrated a willful or continuing disregard for the safety or soundness of the credit union.

The commissioner may suspend or remove any director, officer, or employee of a credit union who, under the laws of this state, the United States, or any other state or territory of the United States:

Has entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to or been convicted of a crime involving theft or fraud that is classified as a felony; or

Is subject to an order removing or suspending such individual from office, or prohibiting such individual's participation in the conduct of the affairs of any credit union, savings and loan association, bank, or other financial institution.

A suspension or removal order shall specify the grounds for the suspension or removal. A copy of the order shall be sent to the credit union concerned and to each member of its board of directors. The commissioner shall send written notice by certified mail, return receipt requested, to any person affected by paragraph (a) of this subsection (8), at least ten days prior to a hearing held pursuant to section 24-4-105, C.R.S., at which the commissioner shall preside.

If the commissioner determines that extraordinary circumstances require immediate action, a person may be suspended or removed under paragraph (a) of this subsection (8) without notice or a hearing, but the commissioner shall conduct a hearing under section 24-4-105, C.R.S., within thirty days after such suspension or removal.

In extraordinary circumstances, upon order of the commissioner, any hearing conducted pursuant to this section shall be exempt from any provision of law requiring that proceedings of the commissioner be conducted publicly. Such extraordinary circumstances occur when specific concern arises about prompt withdrawal of moneys from the institution.

Any person who performs any duty or exercises any power of a credit union after receipt of a suspension or removal order under subsection (8)(a) of this section commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 298, § 6.

CSA:

C. 47, § 6.

L. 41:

p. 373, § 6.

L. 51:

p. 314, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 38-1-6.

L. 56:

p. 132, § 1.

L. 62:

p. 142, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 38-1-6.

L. 67:

p. 317, § 5.

L. 75:

(1) amended, p. 380, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 81:

(1) amended, p. 615, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 83:

(2) amended, p. 484, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 89:

(1) and (2) amended and (6) to (8) added, p. 608, § 2, effective April 19.

L. 92:

(1) amended, p. 928, § 5, effective February 25.

L. 93:

(3) and (7) amended, p. 1445, § 5, effective June 6.

L. 94:

(1)(b), (2), (4), and (8) amended, p. 63, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(1)(a) amended, p. 85, § 1, effective March 23.

L. 96:

(1)(c) repealed, p. 185, § 3, effective April 8.

L. 2000:

(2) amended, p. 155, § 1, effective August 2.

L. 2002:

(8)(b)(IV) amended, p. 1470, § 35, effective October 1.

L. 2004:

IP(8)(a)(I) amended, p. 130, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

(8)(b)(IV) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3150, § 121, effective March 1, 2022.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsection (8)(b)(IV), see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

11-30-106.5. Assessment of civil money penalties.

After notice and a hearing as provided in article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., and after making a determination that no other appropriate governmental agency has taken similar action against such person for the same act or practice, the commissioner may assess and collect a civil money penalty from any person who has violated any final cease-and-desist order issued by the commissioner pursuant to section 11-30-106 (7) or any suspension order issued pursuant to section 11-30-120.

For the purposes of this section, a violation includes, but is not limited to, any action, by any person alone or with another person, which causes, brings about, or results in the participation in, counseling of, or aiding or abetting of a violation.

In extraordinary circumstances, upon order of the commissioner, any hearing conducted pursuant to this section shall be exempt from any provision of law requiring that proceedings of the commissioner be conducted publicly. Such extraordinary circumstances occur when specific concern arises about prompt withdrawal of moneys from the institution.

Civil money penalties shall be assessed by written notice of assessment of a civil money penalty served upon the person to be assessed. The notice of assessment of a civil money penalty shall state the amount of the penalty, the period for payment, the legal authority for the assessment, and the matters of fact or law constituting the grounds for assessment. The notice of assessment of a civil money penalty may be appealed to the financial services board pursuant to section 11-44-101.8. On appeal, the board may consider, among other matters, whether the civil money penalty assessed by the commissioner is appropriate considering the financial resources of the person assessed.

In determining the amount of the civil money penalty to be assessed, the commissioner shall consider the good faith of the person assessed, the gravity of the violation, any previous violations by the person assessed, and such other matters as the commissioner may deem appropriate; except that the civil money penalty shall be not more than one thousand dollars per day for each day the person assessed is determined by the commissioner to be in violation of a cease-and-desist order or an order of suspension or removal. Alternatively, the commissioner may assess a civil money penalty for such violation in a lump-sum amount not to exceed fifty thousand dollars.

Civil money penalties assessed pursuant to this section shall be due and payable and collected within thirty days after the notice of assessment of a civil money penalty is issued by the commissioner; except that the commissioner may, in the commissioner's discretion, compromise, modify, or set aside any civil money penalty. If any person fails to pay an assessment after it has become due and payable, the commissioner may refer the matter to the attorney general, who shall recover the amount assessed by action in the district court for the city and county of Denver. Any civil money penalty collected pursuant to this section shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit it to the general fund.

Source:

L. 89:

Entire section added, p. 610, § 3, effective April 19.

L. 93:

(2) amended, p. 1445, § 6, effective June 6.

L. 94:

(3) amended, p. 64, § 3, effective July 1.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 1008, § 1, effective August 4.

11-30-107. Fiscal year - meetings.

The fiscal year of all credit unions shall end December 31 of each year. The annual meeting shall be held within five months after the close of said fiscal year. Special meetings may be held in the manner indicated in the bylaws. At all meetings a member shall have but a single vote, whatever his share holdings. There shall be no voting by proxy, but a member other than a natural person may cast a single vote through a delegated agent.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 299, § 7.

CSA:

C. 47, § 7.

L. 41:

p. 374, § 7.

CRS 53:

§ 38-1-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 38-1-7.

L. 67:

p. 318, § 6.

L. 79:

Entire section amended, p. 416, § 1, effective July 1.

11-30-108. Elections.

At the annual meeting, or by other proper balloting within thirty days before and twenty days after the annual meeting, the credit union members shall elect from the membership a board of directors of not less than five members. A supervisory committee of not less than three members and a credit committee of not less than three members or a credit officer shall be elected by the credit union members or appointed by the board of directors as provided in the bylaws of the credit union. All such persons shall hold office for such terms respectively as the bylaws provide and until successors are elected or appointed and qualify. In addition, one or more alternate members of the credit committee may be elected by the credit union members or appointed by the board of directors to serve in the absence of members of the credit committee. No member shall hold more than one elected office simultaneously. A record of the names and addresses of the members of the board and such committees, such alternates, and the officers shall be filed with the commissioner within twenty days after their election or appointment.

Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section, the board of directors may, as provided in the bylaws, appoint an audit committee in lieu of a supervisory committee to carry out the duties and responsibilities of the supervisory committee as contained in section 11-30-111. A record of the names and addresses of the members of the audit committee must be filed with the commissioner within twenty days after their election or appointment.

Source:

L. 31:

p. 300, § 8.

CSA:

C. 47, § 8.

L. 41:

p. 374, § 8.

L. 47:

p. 379, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 38-1-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 38-1-8.

L. 67:

p. 318, § 7.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 567, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 84:

Entire section amended, p. 373, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 131, § 5, effective July 1.

L. 2016:

Entire section amended, (SB 16-125), ch. 99, p. 286, § 1, effective August 10.